Nebraska, session 109, LB746.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB746 LB746
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 81-6,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-6,125 (1) The purpose of the Population Health Information Act is
to designate a health information exchange to provide the data
infrastructure needed to assist in creating a healthier Nebraska and
operating the electronic health records initiative.
(2) The designated health information exchange shall:
(a) Aggregate clinical information from health care entities needed
to support the operation of the medical assistance program under the
Medical Assistance Act;
(b) Act as the designated entity for purposes of access to and
analysis of health data;
(c) Collect and analyze data for purposes of informing the
Legislature, the department, health care providers, and health care
entities as to the cost of, access to, and quality of health care in
Nebraska;
(d) Act as a collector and reporter of public health data for
registry submissions, electronic laboratory reporting, immunization
reporting, and syndromic surveillance from an electronic health record,
which does not include claims data; and
(e) Enable any health care provider or health care entity to access
information available within the designated health information exchange
to evaluate and monitor care and treatment of a patient in accordance
with the privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health
Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191.
(3)(a) Each On or before September 30, 2021, each health care
facility listed in subdivision (b) of this subsection shall participate
in the designated health information exchange through sharing of clinical
information. Such clinical information shall include the clinical data
that the health care facility captured in its existing electronic health
record as permitted by state and federal laws, rules, and regulations.
-2-

LB746 LB746
2026 2026
Any patient health information shared with the designated health
information exchange as determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board shall be provided in accordance with the
privacy and security provisions set forth in the federal Health Insurance
Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and regulations adopted under
the act.
(b) This subsection applies to an ambulatory surgical center, a
critical access hospital, a general acute hospital, a health clinic, a
hospital, an intermediate care facility, a long-term care hospital, a
mental health substance use treatment center, a PACE center, a pharmacy,
a psychiatric or mental hospital, a public health clinic, or a
rehabilitation hospital, as such terms are defined in the Health Care
Facility Licensure Act, or a diagnostic, laboratory, or imaging center.
(c) This subsection does not apply to (i) a state-owned or state-
operated facility or (ii) an assisted-living facility, a nursing
facility, or a skilled nursing facility, as such terms are defined in the
Health Care Facility Licensure Act.
(d) Any connection established by July 1, 2021, between a health
care facility and the designated health information exchange to
facilitate such participation shall be at no cost to the participating
health care facility.
(e) A health care facility may apply to the board for a waiver from
the requirement to participate under this subsection due to a
technological burden. The board shall review the application and
determine whether to waive the requirement. If the board waives the
requirement for a health care facility, the board shall review the waiver
annually to determine if the health care facility continues to qualify
for the waiver.
(f) The board shall not require a health care facility to purchase
or contract for an electronic records management system or service.
(4)(a) Each On or before January 1, 2022, each health insurance plan
-3-

LB746 LB746
2026 2026
shall participate in the designated health information exchange through
sharing of information. Subject to subsection (5) of this section, such
information shall be determined by policies adopted by the Health
Information Technology Board.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Health insurance plan includes any group or individual sickness
and accident insurance policy, health maintenance organization contract,
subscriber contract, employee medical, surgical, or hospital care benefit
plan, or self-funded employee benefit plan to the extent not preempted by
federal law; and
(ii) Health insurance plan does not include (A) accident-only,
disability-income, hospital confinement indemnity, dental, hearing,
vision, or credit insurance, (B) coverage issued as a supplement to
liability insurance, (C) insurance provided as a supplement to medicare,
(D) insurance arising from workers' compensation provisions, (E)
automobile medical payment insurance, (F) insurance policies that provide
coverage for a specified disease or any other limited benefit coverage,
or (G) insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard
to fault and which is statutorily required to be contained in any
liability insurance policy.
(5) The designated health information exchange and the department
shall enter into an agreement to allow the designated health information
exchange to collect, aggregate, analyze, report, and release de-
identified data, as defined by the federal Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, that is derived from the administration
of the medical assistance program. Such written agreement shall be
executed no later than September 30, 2021.
(6) In addition to the right to opt out as provided in section
71-2454, an individual shall have the right to opt out of the designated
health information exchange or the sharing of information required under
subsections (3) and (4) of this section. The designated health
-4-

LB746 LB746
2026 2026
information exchange shall adopt a patient opt-out policy consistent with
the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996
and other applicable federal requirements. Such policy shall not apply to
mandatory public health reporting requirements.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-6,125, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-5-